Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1486.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; Coalmine Canyon youth and community recreation center; exemption A. The sum of $750,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to the Navajo Nation for the surveying, design, planning, restoration and rehabilitation of existing structures and for equipment costs of the Coalmine Canyon youth and community recreation center. The recreation center must include a park with a full-size basketball court and an outdoor multiuse recreation facility and security lights. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.